Utah statutes.
20A-5-101.   Notice of election.
(1)  On or before February 1 in each regular general election year, the
lieutenant governor shall prepare and transmit a written notice to each county
clerk that:
(a)  designates the offices to be filled at the regular general election;
(b)  identifies the dates for filing a declaration of candidacy for those
offices; and
(c)  contains a description of any ballot propositions to be decided by the
voters that have qualified for the ballot as of that date.
(2) (a)  No later than February 15, each county clerk shall:
(i)  publish a notice:
(A)  once in a newspaper published in that county; and
(B)  as required in Section 45-1-101; or
(ii) (A)  cause a copy of the notice to be posted in a conspicuous place most
likely to give notice of the election to the voters in each voting precinct
within the county; and
(B)  prepare an affidavit of that posting, showing a copy of the notice and
the places where the notice was posted.
(b)  The notice required by Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  designate the offices to be voted on in that election in that county,
other than local district offices; and
(ii)  identify the dates for filing a declaration of candidacy for those
offices.
(3)  Before each election, the election officer shall give written or printed
notice of:
(a)  the date and place of election;
(b)  the hours during which the polls will be open;
(c)  the polling places for each voting precinct; and
(d)  the qualifications for persons to vote in the election.
(4)  To provide the notice required by Subsection (3), the election officer
shall publish the notice at least two days before the election:
(a)  in a newspaper of general circulation common to the area or in which the
election is being held; and
(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
